Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2865
Holder; temporary educational permit; receive license; when.

The holder of a temporary educational permit shall not be entitled to a pharmacist license in the State of Nebraska unless and until such individual meets all of the requirements of law for issuing such pharmacist license.

Laws 1978, LB 675, § 16;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 42;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.32;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 961.